Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3424
Abortion counseling or referral;
act; how construed; refusal to participate in counseling or referral; how
treated.

The
Genetic Counseling Practice Act shall not be construed to require any genetic
counselor to counsel or refer for abortion, and licensing of a genetic counselor
shall not be contingent upon his or her participation in counseling or referral
with respect to abortion. The refusal of a genetic counselor to participate
in counseling or referral with respect to abortion shall not form the basis
for any claim of damages on account of the refusal or for any disciplinary
or recriminatory action against the genetic counselor if the genetic counselor
informs the patient that the genetic counselor will not participate in counseling
or referral with respect to abortion and offers to direct the patient to the
online directory of licensed genetic counselors maintained by the department.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 24.